Washington statutes.
RCW 44.20.010

Engrossed bills filed with secretary of state.

Whenever any bill shall have passed both houses, the house transmitting the enrolled bill to the governor shall also file with the secretary of state the engrossed bill, together with the history of such bill up to the time of transmission to the governor.

[ 1907 c 136 s 1; RRS s 8196.]

NOTES:

Secretary of state to keep record of acts of the legislature: State Constitution Art. 3 s 17; RCW 43.07.040.